Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB882.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Homeowner Harassment Prevention Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Predatory tactics." Any of the following:(1) Repeated and unsolicited attempts by a person, within a one-year period, to contact a homeowner when the homeowner has affirmatively requested that the person, or the person's agent or assignee, refrain from that activity.(2) A threat to a homeowner, whether expressed or 123456789101112131415161718 implied, regarding sale of the homeowner's real property."Real estate developer."(1) A person who:(i) acquires improved or unimproved real property;(ii) improves the real property, if unimproved, with a residential building or improves an existing residential building on the real property; and(iii) sells the improved real property or any portion thereof.(2) The term does not include a person who makes improvements to real property that constitute the person's primary residence if:(i) the primary residence is a single-family dwelling or a multiple-family dwelling that does not exceed three stories in height and contains six or fewer dwelling units; and(ii) no more than one real property is sold by the person during a calendar year."Real estate professional." A real estate agent, real estate broker or real estate developer.Section 3. Required disclosures.At the time of contacting a homeowner, a real estate professional, construction company or other person engaged in acquiring real property for development, or his agent or assignee, shall identify himself and the intended buyer of the homeowner's real property.Section 4. Prohibited acts.A real estate professional, construction company or other person engaged in acquiring real property for development, their agent or assignee, may not use predatory tactics to solicit a 20250HB0882PN0920 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 homeowner to sell the homeowner's real property.Section 5. Civil penalties.In addition to any other penalty provided under law, the Office of Attorney General may assess a civil penalty against a person who violates any provision of this act of not less than $2,000 nor more than $10,000 for each violation. Each day that a violation continues shall constitute a separate and distinct violation.Section 6. Right of action.A person who is aggrieved by a violation of the provisions of this act may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction for legal and equitable relief as may be appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this act. The court may, in addition to any judgment awarded the plaintiff, award reasonable attorney fees and costs of action to be paid by the defendant.Section 7. Vicarious liability.All parties to a solicitation of a homeowner to sell the homeowner's real property in violation of this act shall be vicariously liable for the violations of this act.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0882PN0920 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122